Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 2, section 10, is amended to read: Sec. 10. HIGH-RISE SPRINKLER SYSTEM deleted text begin GRANTdeleted text end PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Eligible building" means an existing residential building in which: (1) at least one story used for human occupancy is 75 feet or more above the lowest level of fire department vehicle accessnew text begin or the building is seven or more stories in heightnew text end ; and (2) at least two-thirds of its units are affordable to households with an annual income at or below deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 60new text end percent of the area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, adjusted for family sizedeleted text begin , that is paying no more than 30 percent of annual income on rentdeleted text end . (c) "Sprinkler system" means the same as the term "fire protection system" as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299M.01. Subd. 2. deleted text begin Grant programdeleted text end new text begin Use of fundsnew text end . The commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency must make grants new text begin and loans new text end to owners of eligible buildings for installation of sprinkler systems and, if necessary, for relocation of residents during the installation of sprinkler systems. Priority shall be given to nonprofit applicants. The maximum grant per eligible building shall be $2,000,000. Each grant to a nonprofit organization shall require a 25 percent match. Each grant to a for-profit organization shall require a 50 percent match. Sec. 2. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION; HIGH-RISE SPRINKLER SYSTEM PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end new text begin (b) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for the high-rise sprinkler system program in Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 2, section 10. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end